New York, session 2025-2026, A4796.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 368-a of the social services law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (g-1) to read as follows: 3 (g-1) Notwithstanding paragraph (g) of this subdivision, section three 4 hundred sixty-four-j of this title or any other provision of law, a 5 reimbursement for home health services provided for in accordance with 6 paragraph (d) of subdivision two of section three hundred sixty-five-a 7 of this title by an individual or shared aide provided by an approved 8 home health agency when such services are determined to be cost effec- 9 tive and appropriate to meet the recipient's needs for assistance shall 10 be increased to a minimum compensation standard. The commissioner, in 11 consultation with the commissioner of the office for people with devel- 12 opmental disabilities, shall develop methodologies to determine such 13 minimum compensation standard. 14 § 2. Section 13.15 of the mental hygiene law, as added by chapter 978 15 of the laws of 1977, the section heading as amended by chapter 168 of 16 the laws of 2010, subdivision (a) as amended by chapter 37 of the laws 17 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 13.15 Programs of the office for people with developmental disabili- 19 ties. 20 (a) The commissioner shall plan, promote, establish, develop, coordi- 21 nate, evaluate, and conduct programs and services of prevention, diagno- 22 sis, examination, care, treatment, rehabilitation, training, and 23 research for the benefit of individuals with developmental disabilities. 24 Such programs shall include but not be limited to in-patient, out-pa- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07248-01-5 A. 4796 2 1 tient, partial hospitalization, day care, emergency, rehabilitative, and 2 other appropriate treatments and services. [He] Such commissioner shall 3 take all actions that are necessary, desirable, or proper to implement 4 the purposes of this chapter and to carry out the purposes and objec- 5 tives of the office within the amounts made available therefor by appro- 6 priation, grant, gift, devise, bequest, or allocation from the mental 7 health services fund established under section ninety-seven-f of the 8 state finance law. 9 (b) The activities described in subdivision (a) of this section may be 10 undertaken in cooperation and agreement with other offices, departments 11 or agencies of the state, local or federal government, or with other 12 organizations and individuals. 13 (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, 14 shall develop minimum compensation standards for the reimbursement of 15 home health agencies and persons employed thereof. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 17 it shall have become a law.